Washington statutes.
RCW 39.58.230

Liability after merger, takeover, or acquisition.

The liability of a public depositary under this chapter shall not be altered by any merger, takeover, or acquisition, except to the extent that such liability is assumed by agreement or operation of law by the successor entity or resulting financial institution.

[ 2009 c 9 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 9: See note following RCW 39.58.010.